Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-4019
Hearing; procedure.

(1) A licensee may request a hearing on any proposed notice of deficiency issued by the Tax Commissioner.

(2) Any person licensed or certified under the Tobacco Products Tax Act may request a hearing after notice that the Tax Commissioner intends to revoke, cancel, or suspend a license or certification.

(3) Such request shall be made within twenty days after the receipt of the notice of deficiency or the notice that the Tax Commissioner intends to revoke, cancel, or suspend a license or certification.

(4) At such hearing the Tax Commissioner, or any officer or employee of the Tax Commissioner designated in writing, may examine any books, papers, or memoranda bearing upon the matter at issue and require the attendance of any person licensed or certified under the Tobacco Products Tax Act or any officer or employee of such person having knowledge pertinent to such hearing. The Tax Commissioner or his or her designee shall have the power to administer oaths to persons testifying at such hearing.

(5) During the hearing, the Tax Commissioner or his or her designee shall not be bound by the technical rules of evidence, and no informality in any proceeding or in the manner of taking testimony shall invalidate any order or decision made or approved by the Tax Commissioner.

Laws 1987, LB 730, § 19;

Laws 2024, LB1204, § 34.